Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3503
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Surgical First Assistant Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-3504 to 38-3510 apply.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 3.